Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 48
ELECTRONIC FUNDS TRANSFERS FOR FINANCIAL
INSTITUTIONS OTHER THAN BANKS

Cross references:

For electronic funds transfers for banks, see article 105 of this title 11.

Section

11-48-101. Applicability - definition.

This article applies to any savings and loan association organized under article 41 of this title or under federal law and having its principal office in this state and any credit union organized under article 30 of this title or federal law and having its principal office in this state. As used in this article, "financial institution" means any such savings and loan association or credit union.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 553, § 3, effective May 20.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 1208, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1472, § 30, effective July 1.

11-48-102. Limitations.

This article shall be construed to authorize any financial institution to engage in electronic funds transfers only to the extent of transactions authorized in applicable law governing such institutions. The provisions of this article shall govern as to communications facilities owned or controlled by such institutions.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 553, § 3, effective May 20.

11-48-103. Communications facility.

As used in this article, "communications facility" means an attended or unattended electronic information processing device, other than an ordinary telephone instrument, located in this state separate and apart from a financial institution and through which account holders and financial institutions may engage in transactions by means of either the instant transmission (online) of electronic impulses to and from the financial institution or its data processing agent or the recording of electronic impulses or other indicia of a transaction for delayed transmission (off-line) to a financial institution or its data processing agent. Such a device located on the premises of a financial institution shall be a communications facility if such device is utilized by the account holders of other financial institutions.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 553, § 3, effective May 20.

11-48-104. No operation by financial institution employees.

No communications facility located separate and apart from a financial institution shall be operated by an employee or agent of any financial institution, and no agent or employee of the retailer where a facility is located who operates it shall be deemed to be the agent or employee of any financial institution using the facility or with which transactions are accomplished by means of the facility. No employee or agent of any financial institution shall be stationed at any communications facility located separate and apart from the financial institution except on a temporary basis for the purpose of instructing customers in the use of facilities or for servicing or observing the operation of such facilities.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 554, § 3, effective May 20.

11-48-105. Sharing.

A financial institution shall make any communications facility available to any similar financial institution for the use of its account holders on the basis of fair, equitable, and nondiscriminatory standards and charges. For purposes of this section, a savings and loan association is similar to any other savings and loan association and a credit union is similar to any other credit union. A communications facility on the premises of a financial institution is not subject to the mandatory access provisions of this subsection (1). Such a facility may but is not required to be made available for use by the account holders of any similar financial institution.

A financial institution may but is not required to make the use of any communications facility available to a dissimilar financial institution and to any state or national bank in this state for the use of its account holders. Any such use shall be on a fair and reasonable contractual basis.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 554, § 3, effective May 20.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1472, § 31, effective July 1.

11-48-106. Consumer protection.

Every financial institution using a communications facility shall provide its account holders, at the time the facility is used, with a receipt or record of each transaction initiated at a facility. Such receipt or record shall be admissible as evidence in any legal action or proceeding and shall constitute prima facie proof of the transaction evidenced by such receipt or record. When a financial institution furnishes a statement of account to an account holder, such statement shall reflect each transaction affecting such account made by the account holder at a communications facility during the period covered by the statement.

With respect to any card or other device issued to an account holder for use at a communications facility, any account holder whose card or device is lost or stolen and subsequently used by an unauthorized person shall only be liable for the lesser of fifty dollars or the amount of money, goods, or services obtained by the unauthorized use prior to notice to the financial institution which issued the card or device of the theft or loss. If the unauthorized use occurs through no fault of the account holder, no liability shall be imposed on the account holder.

No account holder shall be held liable for any loss occurring as the result of any tampering or manipulation of a communications facility unless he performs or authorizes such acts.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 554, § 3, effective May 20.

11-48-107. Access to automated clearinghouse.

Effective January 1, 1978, an automated clearinghouse in this state shall permit direct access to or membership in such clearinghouse by any financial institution if such access is not prohibited by any rule or regulation of the federal reserve board and if the financial institution agrees to abide by the rules of the clearinghouse. For purposes of this section, "automated clearinghouse" means a group of financial institutions or banks which have agreed to abide by certain rules and procedures for the purpose of exchanging payments and settling balances of participating financial institutions on computer tape to accomplish settlement of transactions by posting credits and debits to reserve balances maintained by member banks of the federal reserve systems through the federal reserve system.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire article added, p. 554, § 3, effective May 20.